en: European Pine
la: Pinus Pinea

en: Cedar nuts
de: Zedernkerne
fr: Pignons de cèdre
hr: Cedrovine

en: Pine nuts(roasted), Roasted pin nuts
nb: Tørristede pinjekjerner

it: olio di noce di cedro
fr: huile de noix de cèdre

en: Black walnuts
de: Schwarznuss
es: Nogal negro americano
fr: Noix noir
it: Noce nero
la: Juglans nigra
nl: Zwarte walnoot

en: Walnuts, Akhrot Giri, English walnuts
bg: Орехи
de: Walnüsse
es: Nueces
fi: saksanpähkinät
fr: Noix
hr: Orasi
it: Noci
ja: クルミ, くるみ, 胡桃
la: Juglans regia
lt: Graikiniai riešutai
lv: Valrieksti
nb: Valnøtter
nl: Walnoten
ru: Грецкие орехи
sv: Valnötter, valnöt
tr: Ceviz
zh: 核桃, 胡桃

en: Walnuts from the Périgord
fr: Noix du Périgord, Noix Franquette
nl: Walnoten uit de Périgord

en: Walnuts from Grenoble
fr: Noix de Grenoble
nl: Walnoten uit Grenoble

en: Fresh walnuts, Walnuts with shell
es: Nueces cascara
fr: Noix fraîches, noix sèches, noix en coques
nl: Verse walnoten, Walnoten (vers), Hele walnoten

en: Walnut kernels, Walnut pieces, Shelled walnuts, Dried husked walnut, Walnut halves and pieces, chopped walnuts, walnut halves
da: Valnøddekerner
de: Walnusskerne, geschälte Walnüss
es: Granos de nuez, Nueces mondadas, Nueces peladas, Nueces sin cáscara
fi: saksanpähkinän sydämet, kuorelliset saksanpähkinät
fr: Cerneaux de noix, Noix décortiquées, Noix séchée pelée, Cerneaux
hr: Jezgre oraha
it: Gherigli di noci
lt: Graikinių riešutų branduoliai
lv: Valrieksti pusītes
nb: Valnøttkjerner
nl: Walnoten (gepeld), Gepelde walnoten
ru: ядра грецкого ореха
sv: valnötskärnor
zh: 带壳核桃

en: Nut flours
bg: Ядково брашно
de: Nussmehle
es: Harinas de frutos de cáscara, Frutos de cáscara en polvo, Harinas de frutos secos, Frutos secos en polvo
fi: pähkinäjauhot
fr: Farines de fruits à coques, Poudres de fruits à coques
hr: Brašna od orašastih plodova
it: Farine di noci
lt: Riešutų miltai
nl: Gemalen noten

en: Chestnut flours
es: Harinas de castañas
fr: Farines de châtaignes, Farines de châtaigne
hr: Brašna od kestena
it: Farine di castagne
lt: Kaštonų miltai
nl: Kastanjemelen, Gemalen kastanjes

en: Chestnut flours T110
es: Harinas de castañas T110
fr: Farines de châtaigne T110
hr: Brašna od kestena t110

en: Nut butters
ca: Mantega de fruita seca
de: Nußbutter
es: Mantecas de frutos de cáscara, Mantecas de frutos secos
fi: pähkinävoit
fr: Beurres de fruits à coques
hr: Maslaci od orašastih plodova
hu: Mogyoróvajak
it: Burro di frutta secca, Burro di semi oleosi
ja: ナッツバター
lt: Riešutų sviestai
nl: Notenpasta's
pl: Masła z orzechów, pasty z orzechów
pt: Manteiga de frutos secos
ru: Ореховые пасты, Ореховая паста

en: Almond butters
bg: Тахан от бадеми
de: Mandelmus, Mandelbutter
es: Mantecas de almendra
fi: mantelivoit
fr: Purées d'amande, Purée d'amande, Beurres d'amandes
hr: Maslaci od badema
it: Burro di mandorle
ja: アーモンドバター
lt: Migdolų riešutų sviestai, Migdolų riešutų kremai
nl: Amandelpasta's
pl: Masło migdałowe, Pasta z migdałów, Masło z migdałów
pt: Manteigas de amêndoa
zh: 杏仁酱

en: White almond butters, White almond purees
de: Weißes Mandelmus
fr: Purées d'amande blanche
hr: Pire od bijelih badema
nl: Witte amandelpasta's

en: Whole almond purees
de: Braunes Mandelmus, Ganze Mandelpürees
fr: Purées d'amande complète
hr: Pire od cijelih badema
it: Puree di mandorle intere
nl: Volkoren amandelpasta's

en: Cashew butters, cashew nut butters
de: Cashewmus, Cashewbutter
es: Mantecas de anacardos
fr: Purées de noix de cajou, Purée de noix de cajou, Beurres de noix de cajou, beurre de noix de cajou
hr: Maslaci od indijskog oraha
it: Burri di anacardo
ja: カシューナッツバター
lt: Anakardžių riešutų sviestai
nl: Cashewpasta's
pl: Masło z orzechów nerkowca, Pasta z orzechów nerkowca, Masło z nerkowców, Pasta z nerkowców

en: Hazelnut butters
de: Haselnussmus
es: Mantecas de avellana
fr: Purées de noisette, Purée de noisette, Purées de noisettes, Beurres de noisettes
hr: Maslaci od lješnjaka
it: Burri di nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツバター
lt: Lazdyno riešutų sviestai
nl: Hazelnootpasta's
pl: Masło z orzechów laskowych, Pasta z orzechów laskowych
pt: Manteigas de avelã

en: Macadamia nut butters
es: Mantecas de nueces de macadamia
fr: Beurres de noix de macadamia, purées de noix de macadamia
hr: Maslaca od makadamija oraha
ja: マカダミアナッツバター
lt: Makadamijos riešutų sviestai
nl: Macadamiapasta's